Hawaii statutes.
§414D-32 Articles
of incorporation. (a) The articles of incorporation shall set
forth:

(1) A corporate name for the corporation that
satisfies the requirements of section 414D-61;

(2) The mailing address of the corporation's initial
principal office and the information required by section 425R-4(a);

(3) The name and address of each incorporator;

(4) Whether or not the corporation will have members;
and

(5) Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding
the distribution of assets on dissolution.

(b) The articles of incorporation may set
forth:

(1) The purpose or purposes for which the corporation
is organized, which may be, either alone or in combination with other purposes,
the transaction of any lawful activity;

(2) The names and addresses of the individuals who
are to serve as the initial directors;

(3) Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

(A) Managing and regulating the affairs of
the corporation;

(B) Defining, limiting, and regulating the
powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and members (or any class of
members), including but not limited to the power to merge with another
corporation, convert to another type of entity, sell all or substantially all
of the corporation's assets, or dissolve the corporation; and

(C) The characteristics, qualifications,
rights, limitations, and obligations attaching to each or any class of members;

(4) Any provision that under this chapter is required
or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws;

(5) Provisions eliminating or limiting the personal
liability of a director to the corporation or members of the corporation for
monetary damages for breach of the director's duties to the corporation and its
members; provided that such a provision may not eliminate or limit the
liability of a director:

(A) For any breach of the director's duty of
loyalty to the corporation or its members;

(B) For acts or omissions not in good faith
or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

(C) For any transaction from which a director
derived an improper personal economic benefit; or

(D) Under sections 414D-150 to 414D-152.

(c) None of the
provisions specified in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of
a director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when the
provision becomes effective.

(d) The
articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers
enumerated in this chapter. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §39; am
L 2003, c 124, §24; am L 2009, c 55, §18]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next